Montana, session 2025, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 18-2-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"18-2-302. Bid security -- waiver -- authority to submit. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsection
(2), each bid must be accompanied by bid security in the amount of 10% of the bid. The security may consist of
cash, a cashier's check, a certified check, a bank money order, a certificate of deposit, a money market
certificate, an irrevocable letter of credit, or a bank draft. The security must be:
(i) drawn and issued by a federally chartered or state-chartered bank or savings and loan
association that is insured by or for which insurance is administered by the federal deposit insurance
corporation;
(ii) drawn and issued by a credit union insured by the national credit union share insurance fund;
or
(iii) a bid bond or bonds executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state of
Montana. The state or other governmental entity may accept electronic bid bonds signed electronically or
otherwise verified by the bidder and the surety.
(b) The state or other governmental entity may not require that a bid bond or bond provided for in
subsection (1)(a)(iii) be furnished by a particular surety company or by a particular insurance producer for a
surety company.
(2) The state or other governmental entity may waive the requirements for bid security on building
or construction projects, as defined in 18-2-101, that cost less than $150,000.
(3) The bid security must be signed by an individual authorized to submit the security by the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 29
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 29
corporation or other business entity on whose behalf the security is submitted. If the request for bid or other
specifications provided by the state or other governmental entity specify the form or content of the bid security,
the security submitted must comply with the requirements of that specification."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 29
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 29, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 29
INTRODUCED BY J. ESP
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
AN ACT ALLOWING ELECTRONIC BID BONDS FOR STATE BUILDING OR CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS;
AND AMENDING SECTION 18-2-302, MCA.”